Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 3 Superintendents

21-2-70.
Powers and duties.

Each superintendent within his or her county or municipality shall exercise all the powers granted to him or her by this chapter and shall perform all the duties imposed upon him or her by this chapter, which shall include the following:

To receive and act upon all petitions presented by electors, the board of registrars, or the county executive committee of a political party for the division, redivision, alteration, change, or consolidation of precincts;

To receive and determine the sufficiency of nomination petitions of candidates filing notice of their candidacy with him or her in accordance with this chapter;

To prepare and publish, in the manner provided by this chapter, all notices and advertisements, in connection with the conduct of elections, which may be required by law, and to transmit immediately to the Secretary of State a copy of any publication in which a call for a special primary, election, or runoff is issued;

To select and equip polling places for use in primaries and elections in accordance with this chapter;

To purchase, except voting machines, preserve, store, and maintain election equipment of all kinds, including voting booths and ballot boxes and to procure ballots and all other supplies for primaries and elections;

To appoint poll officers and other officers to serve in primaries and elections in accordance with this chapter;

To make and issue such rules, regulations, and instructions, consistent with law, including the rules and regulations promulgated by the State Election Board, as he or she may deem necessary for the guidance of poll officers, custodians, and electors in primaries and elections;

To instruct poll officers and others in their duties, calling them together in meetings whenever deemed advisable, and to inspect systematically and thoroughly the conduct of primaries and elections in the several precincts of his or her county to the end that primaries and elections may be honestly, efficiently, and uniformly conducted;

To receive from poll officers the returns of all primaries and elections, to canvass and compute the same, and to certify the results thereof to such authorities as may be prescribed by law;

To announce publicly, by posting in his or her office, the results of all primaries and elections held in his or her county or municipality;

In any general election at which a proposal to amend the Constitution or to provide for a new Constitution is submitted to the electors for ratification, the election superintendent shall provide copies of the summary of such proposal prepared pursuant to Article X, Section I, Paragraph II of the Constitution as provided in this paragraph. A reasonable number of copies of such summary shall be conspicuously available in each polling place;

To prepare annually a budget estimate of his or her expenses under this chapter, in which shall be set forth an itemized list of expenditures for the preceding two years and an itemized estimate of the amount of money necessary to be appropriated for the ensuing year and to submit the same at the time and in the manner and form other budget estimates of his or her county or municipality are now or may hereafter be required to be filed;

To conduct all elections in such manner as to guarantee the secrecy of the ballot and to perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law;

To become certified by satisfactorily completing a certification program as set forth in Code Section 21-2-101; and

In the case of a judge of the probate court serving as the election superintendent, such person shall take an oath in the following form upon assuming the duties of election superintendent which shall apply to all primaries and elections conducted by such person throughout such person’s tenure as election superintendent:

I,
_______________ , do swear (or affirm) that I will as superintendent duly attend all ensuing primaries and elections during the continuance thereof, that I will to the best of my ability prevent any fraud, deceit, or abuse in carrying on the same, that I will make a true and perfect return of such primaries and elections, and that I will at all times truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duties in accordance with Georgia laws to the best of my judgment and ability.

In the case of a board of elections, each member of the board shall take an oath in the following form upon becoming a member of the board which shall apply to all primaries and elections conducted by the board throughout such person’s tenure on the board:

I,
_______________ , do swear (or affirm) that I will as a member of the board of elections duly attend all ensuing primaries and elections during the continuance thereof, that I will to the best of my ability prevent any fraud, deceit, or abuse in carrying on the same, that I will make a true and perfect return of such primaries and elections, and that I will at all times truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duties in accordance with Georgia laws to the best of my judgment and ability.

In the case of an election supervisor or designee for a board of elections or board of elections and registration, the election supervisor or designee shall take an oath in the following form upon being appointed as an election supervisor or designee of the board which shall apply to all primaries and elections conducted by the board throughout such person’s tenure:

I,
_______________ , do swear (or affirm) that I will duly attend all ensuing primaries and elections during the continuance thereof, that I will to the best of my ability prevent any fraud, deceit, or abuse in carrying on the same, that I will make a true and perfect return of such primaries and elections, and that I will at all times truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duties in accordance with Georgia laws to the best of my judgment and ability.

Each judge of the probate court serving as an election superintendent, each member of a board of elections or board of elections and registration, and each election supervisor or designee for a board of elections or board of elections and registration serving on July 1, 2011, shall take the appropriate oath as set forth in this Code section which shall apply to all primaries and elections conducted throughout such person’s tenure in that position.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 3/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2008, p. 817, § 3/HB 1098; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 1/SB 82.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

21-2-70.1.
Municipal superintendents; eligibility.

The municipal superintendent shall conduct, in accordance with this chapter, all municipal elections held within his or her municipality.

The municipal superintendent shall be a person or committee selected by the governing authority of the municipality in a public meeting, and such selection shall be recorded in the minutes of such meeting. The municipal superintendent shall receive compensation fixed and paid by the governing authority of the municipality from municipal funds. The appointment shall be made in a public meeting, and the appointment shall be recorded in the minutes of said meeting. In the event that a municipality fails to make an appointment, the city clerk shall serve as the municipal superintendent. A parent, spouse, child, brother, sister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law of a candidate shall not be eligible to serve as a municipal superintendent in any primary or election in which such candidate’s name appears on the ballot.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-70.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 4/HB 1112.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-2-71.
Payment by county or municipality of superintendent’s expenses; study and report on acceptance and equitable distribution of donations.

The governing authority of each county or municipality shall appropriate annually and from time to time, to the superintendent of such county or municipality, the funds that it shall deem necessary for the conduct of primaries and elections in such county or municipality and for the performance of his or her other duties under this chapter, including:

Compensation of the poll officers, custodians, and other assistants and employees provided for in this chapter;

Expenditures and contracts for expenditures by the superintendent for polling places;

Purchase or printing, under contracts made by the superintendent, of all ballots and other election supplies required by this chapter, or which the superintendent shall consider necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Maintenance of all voting equipment required by this chapter, or which the superintendent shall consider necessary to carry out this chapter; and

All other expenses arising out of the performance of his or her duties under this chapter.

No superintendent shall take or accept any funding, grants, or gifts from any source other than from the governing authority of the county or municipality, the State of Georgia, or the federal government.

The State Election Board shall study and report to the General Assembly a proposed method for accepting donations intended to facilitate the administration of elections and a method for an equitable distribution of such donations state wide by October 1, 2021.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-402, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 7; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 9/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, designated the existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a) and added subsections (b) and (c).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-72.
Primary and election records to be open to public.

Except when otherwise provided by law or court order, the primary and election records of each superintendent, registrar, municipal governing authority, and committee of a political party or body, including registration statements, nomination petitions, affidavits, certificates, tally papers, returns, accounts, contracts, reports, and other documents in official custody, except the contents of voting machines, shall be open to public inspection and may be inspected and copied by any elector of the county or municipality during usual business hours at any time when they are not necessarily being used by the custodian or his or her employees having duties to perform in reference thereto; provided, however, that such public inspection shall only be in the presence of the custodian or his or her employee and shall be subject to proper regulation for the safekeeping of such documents and subject to the further provisions of this chapter. The custodian shall also, upon request, if photocopying equipment is available in the building in which the records are housed, make and furnish to any member of the public copies of any of such records upon payment of the actual cost of copying the records requested.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 6; Ga. L. 1982, p. 437, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 7/HB 244.

Cross references.

Penalty for willful refusal by superintendent to permit public inspection of election records, §

21-2-585

.

Opening of public records for inspection by public generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

21-2-73.
Preservation of primary and election records.

All primary and election documents on file in the office of the election superintendent of each county, municipal governing authority, superintendent, registrar, committee of a political party or body, or other officer shall be preserved therein for a period of at least 24 months and then the same may be destroyed unless otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-404, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 7; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 8/HB 244.

Cross references.

Maintenance and disposition of public records generally, §

50-18-90

et seq.

21-2-74.
Creation of board to assume duties of superintendent in counties without a board of elections and in which judge of probate court is candidate for public office.

If a county does not have a board of elections and if the judge of the probate court of that county is a candidate, with opposition, for any public office in a primary or election, a board to be composed of the judge of the probate court who shall serve as chairperson, of an elector of the county named by the state Democratic executive committee, and of an elector of the county named by the state Republican executive committee shall assume the duties of the election superintendent for any such primary or election.

In selecting a person to serve, the state executive committee is authorized to seek the recommendation of the county executive committee, if any; persons from the county who are active in the party; persons who are present or former officials in the party; persons who hold political office or who have sought political office as candidates of the party; and such other persons as the committee shall desire to consult.

Within five days after the close of qualifying, the judge of the probate court shall notify the state Democratic and Republican party executive committees in writing of the need to appoint a member of the board. The state executive committees shall have 14 days from the close of qualifying to appoint their respective members of the board. If the state executive committee of a party has not notified the judge of the probate court of its appointment by the close of business on the fourteenth day after the close of qualifying, the judge of the probate court shall notify the chief judge of the superior court of the county. The chief judge shall appoint an elector of the county to serve on the board within seven days following the notice from the judge of the probate court. A board member may resign by giving written notice to the probate judge. In the event of the death, resignation, or other vacancy of the position of an appointed board member, the probate judge shall immediately notify the state executive committee of the appropriate party of such vacancy, and the state executive committee shall promptly fill such vacancy. If the state executive committee has not filled such vacancy within seven days after notification of such vacancy by the probate judge, the probate judge shall notify the chief judge of the superior court of the county of such vacancy and the chief judge shall appoint a person to serve within seven days after being so notified.

The judge of the probate court shall swear in the other board members and shall instruct the other board members concerning their duties on the board. The board members shall begin service on the board on the date on which they take their oath as members of the board and shall serve until the judge of the probate court no longer has opposition or is no longer a candidate for public office, whichever comes first.

Appointed board members shall receive a per diem of $55.00 per day for each day of service on the business of the board. Such fees shall be paid from county funds.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-405, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 8; Ga. L. 1971, p. 602, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1216, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-74.1.
Acting election superintendents during vacancy; filling vacancies; compensation.

If a county does not have a board of elections and:

There is a vacancy in the office of judge of the probate court that has not been filled pursuant to Code Section 15-9-10 or 15-9-11; or

The judge of the probate court is incapacitated and unable to perform the duties of the election superintendent for a period of more than five days;

The chief judge of the superior court in the circuit to which the county is assigned shall appoint a qualified individual to serve as the acting election superintendent during such vacancy or incapacitation.

Upon the filling of a vacancy in the office of judge of the probate court pursuant to Code Section 15-9-10 or 15-9-11, the judge of the probate court shall resume the duties of the election superintendent.

The sole county commissioner or the board of county commissioners shall fix the compensation of the individual who serves as acting election superintendent until the vacancy is filled or the incapacitation ends. The compensation shall be paid from the general funds of the county.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-74.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 10/SB 202.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective March 25, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-75.
Eligibility of persons holding elective public office, or office in political party, to serve on county board of elections.

No person who holds elective public office, as defined in this chapter and including every municipal office to which persons can be elected by a vote of the electors under the laws of this state, shall be eligible to serve as a member of a county board of elections during the term of such elective office; and the position of any county board of elections member shall be deemed vacant upon such member’s qualifying as a candidate for elective public office, as defined in this chapter and including any municipal office to which persons can be elected by a vote of the electors under the laws of this state.

No person who holds office in a political party at any level of such political party shall be eligible to serve as chairperson of a county board of elections during the term of such political party office. On and after April 15, 1996, the position of any chairperson of a county board of elections shall be deemed vacant upon such chairperson’s assuming a political party office.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-605.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1216, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-76.
Eligibility of person to serve as county election superintendent.

No person who holds elective office, as defined in this chapter and including every municipal office to which persons can be elected by a vote of the electors under the laws of this state but excluding the office of probate judge, shall be eligible to serve as county or municipal election superintendent during the term of such elective office; and the position of any election superintendent other than a probate judge shall be deemed vacant upon such superintendent’s qualifying as a candidate for elective public office, as defined in this chapter and including any municipal office to which persons can be elected by a vote of the electors under the laws of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 1216, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 3.

21-2-77.
Electronic election returns.

Beginning with the election cycle in the year 2000, the superintendent of elections of each county shall provide electronically to the Secretary of State, within 45 days after the close of voting, election returns divided by precinct for each precinct in their respective counties for all primaries, elections, special primaries, special elections, and runoffs for such elections for federal or state offices held in that year or any following year.

Beginning with the election cycle in the year 2002, the superintendent of elections of each county shall provide electronically to the Secretary of State, within seven days after the close of voting, election returns divided by precinct for each precinct in their respective counties for all primaries, elections, special primaries, special elections, and runoffs for such elections for federal, state, and county offices held in that year or any following year.

The Secretary of State is authorized to prescribe by rule or regulation the type of electronic format for the provision of such election returns.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 13, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 8.

Law reviews.

For note on 2000 enactment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 178 (2000).